Indiana, session 2026, SB230.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-32-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2011,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The governing body of a district consists of
five (5) supervisors as follows:
(1) Two (2) who are appointed.
(2) Three (3) who are elected.
(b) To hold the position of elected supervisor, an individual:
(1) must be an occupier of a tract of land that is located within the
district;
(2) must maintain the individual's permanent residence within the
district; and
(3) must be qualified by training and experience to perform the
duties that this article imposes on supervisors; and
(4) must complete training provided by the division of soil
conservation within a year of being placed on the governing
body of a district.
(c) To hold the position of appointed supervisor, an individual:
(1) must be of voting age;
(2) must maintain the individual's permanent residence within the
district; and
(3) must be qualified by training and experience to perform the
SEA 230

2
duties that this article imposes on supervisors; and
(4) must complete training provided by the division of soil
conservation within a year of being placed on the governing
body of a district.
SECTION 2. IC 14-32-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2011,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) During the first quarter of each calendar
year, each district shall hold an annual meeting of all land occupiers in
the district. The meeting shall be held on a date designated by the
supervisors. The supervisors shall give due notice of the time and place
of the meeting.
(b) At the meeting:
(1) the supervisors shall make a full and an accurate report of the
activities and financial affairs of the district since the previous
annual meeting; and
(2) an election shall be conducted by the land occupiers present
to elect one (1) supervisor to a three (3) year term of office
beginning on the date of the meeting.
(c) The supervisors shall provide a copy of the annual report
presented at the meeting to the board and, Each district shall provide
a copy of its annual report to the local governing body, the public,
and the division of soil conservation at the district's annual
meeting. A district shall also make the report available, upon
request, to:
(1) other cooperating agencies;
(2) residents of the district; and
(3) any other individual or entity that requests a copy of the
annual report.
SECTION 3. IC 14-32-4-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The election held
at the annual meeting of land occupiers shall be conducted by an
election committee appointed under this section.
(b) In Not later than October 31, the district chairman shall do the
following:
(1) Appoint an election committee made up of a supervisor as
chairman and two (2) interested citizens who reside in the
county.
(2) Submit the names of the committee members to the board by
November 1.
Associate supervisors and staff of the division of soil conservation
shall not serve on the election committee.
SECTION 4. IC 14-32-4-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.129-2011,
SEA 230

3
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The election committee appointed under
section 7 of this chapter shall do the following:
(1) Select qualified individuals as prospective nominees to fill any
vacancies that exist among the elected supervisors of the district.
(2) Contact and ascertain the willingness and ability of each
individual to serve if elected.
(3) Submit the list of nominees with the qualifications for
certification and printing of a sample ballot to the board by
December 1.
(4) Place the names of the prospective nominees selected under
subdivisions (1) and (2) in nomination at the meeting and provide
an opportunity for additional nominations to be made from the
floor.
(5) After nominations are closed:
(A) if only one (1) candidate is nominated, allow for the
election of the sole candidate by the land occupiers by a show
of hands; and
(B) if more than one (1) candidate is nominated, distribute a
ballot to each land occupier present at the meeting.
(6) If a ballot is distributed, collect and count the ballots after
each land occupier present at the meeting has had an opportunity
to vote.
(7) Report the results of the election to the chairman.
(b) If an election committee does not fulfill the requirements of
subsection (a):
(1) no election shall be held; and
(2) the governing body of a district shall fill the positions in
the manner described by section 13 of this chapter.
SECTION 5. IC 14-32-4-10.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.175-2006,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a) The board governing body of a district
may appoint associate supervisors to assist in performing duties in each
district.
(b) Associate supervisors are nonvoting members of the board
governing body of a district and may not hold officer positions on the
board. governing body of a district.
(c) Associate supervisors may be reimbursed for approved expenses
but are not entitled to per diem.
SECTION 6. IC 14-32-4-13 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) If a vacancy in
the position of elected supervisor occurs during the district's operating
SEA 230

4
year:
(1) the district supervisors shall, within thirty (30) days after the
vacancy occurs, recommend to the board in writing one (1) or
more individuals qualified to fill the position;
(2) at the first board meeting held after the board receives a
recommendation under subdivision (1), the board shall act upon
the recommendation and appoint an individual to temporarily fill
the vacancy; and
(3) the board shall notify the supervisors of the appointment made
by the board.
(b) The individual appointed to temporarily fill a vacancy under
subsection (a) shall serve until the district's next annual meeting.
(c) At the annual meeting immediately following the appointment
of an individual to temporarily fill a vacant elected supervisor's
position, the position shall be filled through the regular election
procedure set forth in sections 6 through 9 of this chapter.
(d) If three (3) or more vacant unexpired terms occur
simultaneously in the district, the board shall make appointments
to fill the vacancies.
SECTION 7. IC 14-32-5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.120-2008,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) As used in this section, "landfill" means a
facility where solid waste is to be disposed of through placement on or
beneath the surface of the ground. However, the term does not include
any of the following:
(1) A land application operation regulated under 327 IAC 6.
(2) A surface impoundment.
(3) An injection well.
(4) A facility for the disposal of solid waste other than sludge
from a municipal wastewater treatment plant that is:
(A) generated at the site of the facility; or
(B) generated by the owner or operator of the facility.
(5) An operation permitted under IC 14-34.
(b) As used in this section, "underground injection" means the
subsurface emplacement of fluids through:
(1) a bored, drilled, or driven shaft; or
(2) a dug hole, the depth of which is greater than the hole's largest
surface dimension.
(c) A district shall inspect every landfill located within the
boundaries of the district for compliance with rules adopted under
IC 13-18 or IC 13-19 concerning erosion and sediment control. Each
landfill shall be inspected under this section at least two (2) times each
SEA 230

5
calendar year as follows:
(1) One (1) time before July 1.
(2) One (1) time after June 30 and before December 31.
(d) Not later than ten (10) days after an inspection of a landfill under
this section, the individual who conducted the inspection on behalf of
the district shall prepare a written report on the results of the inspection
and send the report to the following:
(1) The executive of the county.
(2) The commissioner of the department of environmental
management.
(3) The director of the division of soil conservation established
within the Indiana state department of agriculture by
IC 15-11-4-1.
SECTION 8. IC 14-32-8-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.95-2016,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) In addition to funds provided to a district
under section 7 of this chapter or from any other source, the division of
soil conservation shall pay to the district one dollar ($1) for every one
dollar ($1) the district receives:
(1) from a political subdivision; or
(2) if a district receives no funding from a political subdivision,
from any other funding source.
The board shall consider funds received from a source referred to in
subdivision (2) as qualifying for matching payments under this
subsection.
(b) Except as provided in section 8.2 of this chapter, the state is not
obligated to match more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) under this
section.
(c) In order to receive funding under this section each year, a district
must certify to the division of soil conservation the amount of money
the district received from all sources described in subsection (a)(1) or
(a)(2) during the one (1) year period beginning January 1 of the
previous year. The information prepared under this subsection must be
part of the annual financial statement prepared and provided to the
board under IC 14-32-4-22. The division of soil conservation shall
make distributions under this section not later than July 15 of each
year.
(d) Before making distributions under this section, the division of
soil conservation shall determine the total amount of money that has
been certified by all districts as having been provided by sources
described in subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2). If the cumulative amount to be
distributed to all districts exceeds the amount appropriated to the fund,
SEA 230

6
the division of soil conservation shall reduce the distribution to each
district proportionately.
(e) A district must spend money received under this section for the
purposes of the district.
(f) If a district fails to provide a copy of its annual financial
statement to the board by March 1, the district's funding shall be
withheld until the financial statement is received by the board.
SECTION 9. IC 15-11-2-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2018,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) As used in this section, "biomass" means
agriculturally based sources of renewable energy, including the
following:
(1) Agricultural crops.
(2) Agricultural wastes and residues.
(3) Wood and wood byproducts, including the following:
(A) Wood residue.
(B) Forest thinning.
(C) Mill residue wood.
(4) Animal wastes.
(5) Animal byproducts.
(6) Aquatic plants.
(7) Algae.
The term does not include waste from construction and demolition.
(b) The department shall do the following:
(1) Provide administrative and staff support for the following:
(A) The state fair board for purposes of carrying out the
director's duties under IC 15-13-5.
(B) The Indiana corn marketing council for purposes of
administering the duties of the director under IC 15-15-12.
(C) The Indiana dairy industry development board for
purposes of administering the duties of the director under
IC 15-18-5.
(D) The Indiana land resources council under IC 15-12-5.
(E) (D) The Indiana grain buyers and warehouse licensing
agency under IC 26-3-7.
(F) (E) The Indiana grain indemnity corporation under
IC 26-4-3.
(G) (F) The division.
(2) Administer the election of state fair board members under
IC 15-13-5.
(3) Administer state programs and laws promoting agricultural
trade.
SEA 230

7
(4) Administer state livestock or agriculture marketing grant
programs.
(5) Administer economic development efforts for agriculture by
doing the following:
(A) Promoting value added agricultural resources.
(B) Marketing Indiana agriculture to businesses
internationally.
(C) Assisting Indiana agricultural businesses with developing
partnerships with the Indiana economic development
corporation.
(D) Soliciting private funding for selective economic
development and trade initiatives.
(E) Providing for the orderly economic development and
growth of Indiana's agricultural economy.
(F) Facilitating the use of biomass and algae production
systems to generate renewable energy.
(6) Carry out the department's duties under IC 23-15-12.
SECTION 10. IC 15-12-5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Indiana Land Resources Council).
SEA 230

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 230